Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.253

District boundaries for tax purposes.

For the purpose of property taxation and the levying of property taxes the boundaries of the mosquito control district shall be the established official boundary of such district existing on the first day of September of the year in which the levy is made, and no such levy shall be made for any mosquito control district whose boundaries are not duly established on the first day of September of such year.

[ 1959 c 64 s 5.]